Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
Enforcement Support Order

407.180.
Verifications and contents of complaint for support — Location for filing complaint. [Repealed.]

407.190.
Representation by county attorney — Refusal — Secretary for human resources may employ private counsel. [Repealed.]

407.200.
Complaint for a minor. [Repealed.]

407.210.
Duty of court of this state as initiating state. [Repealed.]

407.220.
Costs and fees. [Repealed.]

407.230.
Arrest of defendant. [Repealed.]

407.240.
State information agency. [Repealed.]

407.250.
Duty of court of this state as responding court — Secretary for human resources may employ counsel for obligee. [Repealed.]

407.260.
Duty when court unable to obtain jurisdiction. [Repealed.]

407.270.
Conduct of proceedings. [Repealed.]

407.280.
Order of support. [Repealed.]

407.290.
Initiating state to receive copies of order. [Repealed.]

407.300.
Powers of court to assure compliance with its orders. [Repealed.]

407.310.
Duty of court when acting as responding state to transmit payments and furnish certified statements. [Repealed.]

407.320.
Court of this state as initiating state to receive and disburse payments. [Repealed.]